dev/infreq-apertium-nn-nb.nn.dix
    <pardef n="T__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-ane</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-ar</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-en</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>T</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="lut__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ane</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ar</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ene</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ene</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="skr/å__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>åa</l>
          <r>å<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>åa</l>
          <r>å<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>åene</l>
          <r>å<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ærne</l>
          <r>å<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>åer</l>
          <r>å<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ær</l>
          <r>å<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ået</l>
          <r>å<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>åi</l>
          <r>å<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>åi</l>
          <r>å<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>å</l>
          <r>å<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>å</l>
          <r>å<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>å</l>
          <r>å<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="fl/å__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>åane</l>
          <r>å<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>åar</l>
          <r>å<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>åa</l>
          <r>å<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>åen</l>
          <r>å<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ærne</l>
          <r>å<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ær</l>
          <r>å<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>åi</l>
          <r>å<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>å</l>
          <r>å<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>å</l>
          <r>å<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="rang/el__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>elen</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>elet</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>el</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>el</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>el</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lane</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>la</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lar</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>let</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>li</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="X__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-ane</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-ar</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-en</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>X</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="drops__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>et</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="tennstempel"><i>tennstemp</i><par n="rang/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="stempel"><i>stemp</i><par n="rang/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vingel"><i>ving</i><par n="rang/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="favorittstempel"><i>favorittstemp</i><par n="rang/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="førstedagsstempel"><i>førstedagsstemp</i><par n="rang/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fyrstedagsstempel"><i>fyrstedagsstemp</i><par n="rang/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fattigmannsstempel"><i>fattigmannsstemp</i><par n="rang/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="datostempel"><i>datostemp</i><par n="rang/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gummistempel"><i>gummistemp</i><par n="rang/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="poststempel"><i>poststemp</i><par n="rang/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="skrå"><i>skr</i><par n="skr/å__n"/></e>
    <e lm="justerstempel"><i>justerstemp</i><par n="rang/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kjettarstempel"><i>kjettarstemp</i><par n="rang/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kjøttstempel"><i>kjøttstemp</i><par n="rang/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mentoldrops"><i>mentoldrops</i><par n="drops__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kjøtstempel"><i>kjøtstemp</i><par n="rang/el__n"/></e>
